Utah statutes.
62A-5-304.   Limited admission of persons convicted of felony offenses.

A person with mental retardation who has been convicted of a felony, or if a minor, of a crime that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult, may not be admitted to a mental retardation facility unless it is determined by the division, in accordance with the provisions of this part and other state law, that the person may benefit from treatment in that facility.

